Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-475
Provoking speeches or gestures.

Any person subject to this code who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures toward any other person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 75, p. 1579.